Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3616
Sewer tax levy; authorized; use; vote; when required.

For the purpose of owning, operating, constructing, maintaining, and equipping a sewerage disposal system and plant or plants as authorized by the County Industrial Sewer Construction Act or improving or extending an existing system, a county may make a special levy known as the sewer tax levy not to exceed three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the actual value of all the taxable property within any such county subject to section 77-3443. Any levy exceeding such amount for the purposes of such act shall be submitted for approval to the registered voters of the county at a general election or special election called for such purpose. The proceeds of such levy shall be used only for the purposes enumerated in this section and for no other purpose.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 16;

Laws 1996, LB 299, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 51.